Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4347.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62Q.545, is amended to read: 62Q.545 COVERAGE OF HOME CARE NURSING. (a) Home care nursing services, as provided under section 256B.0625, subdivision 7, with the exception of section 256B.0654, subdivision 4, shall be covered under a health plan for persons who are concurrently covered by both the health plan and enrolled in medical assistance under chapter 256B. (b) For purposes of this section, a period of home care nursing services may be subject to the co-payment, coinsurance, deductible, or other enrollee cost-sharing requirements that apply under the health plan. Cost-sharing requirements for home care nursing services must not place a greater financial burden on the insured or enrollee than those requirements applied by the health plan to other similar services or benefits. Nothing in this section is intended to prevent a health plan company from requiring prior authorization by the health plan company for such services as required by section 256B.0625, subdivision 7, or use of contracted providers under the applicable provisions of the health plan. new text begin (c) Notwithstanding section 62J.26, a health plan must not impose any quantity limitation on the coverage under this section. new text end new text begin (d) Notwithstanding section 62J.26, a health plan must refer to all services meeting the definition of home care nursing services in paragraph (e) as home care nursing services in the health plan's policy, certificate, contract, or other evidence of coverage and related documents, including but not limited to utilization review policies, claims forms, instructions, and communications to enrollees and providers. new text end new text begin (e) For purposes of this section, "home care nursing services" means ongoing, individual, and continuous nursing services that are: new text end new text begin (1) ordered by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant; new text end new text begin (2) provided by a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse acting within the provider's scope of practice; new text end new text begin (3) medically necessary to maintain, stabilize, or restore the recipient's health due to medical complexity or the need for sustained skilled nursing assessment, intervention, or monitoring; and new text end new text begin (4) required for a duration or frequency that cannot be safely or effectively met through intermittent, episodic, or visit-based nursing services. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Paragraph (c) is effective January 1, 2026, and applies to policies issued, offered, or renewed and causes of action accruing on or after that date. Paragraphs (d) and (e) are effective August 1, 2026. new text end